dictionaries/sk_SK-ascii.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1974 Y 1
SFX 1974 ky sich .
PFX 1974 Y 1
PFX 1974 ri r .
SFX 1975 Y 1
SFX 1975 ky simi .
PFX 1975 Y 1
PFX 1975 ri r .
SFX 1976 Y 1
SFX 1976 dky sie .
PFX 1976 Y 1
PFX 1976 r r .
SFX 1977 Y 1
SFX 1977 ky sia .
PFX 1977 Y 1
PFX 1977 ri r .
SFX 1978 Y 1
SFX 1978 ky sej .
PFX 1978 Y 1
PFX 1978 ri r .
SFX 1979 Y 1
SFX 1979 ky siu .
PFX 1979 Y 1
PFX 1979 ri r .
SFX 1980 Y 1
SFX 1980 ky sou .
PFX 1980 Y 1
PFX 1980 ri r .
SFX 1981 Y 1
SFX 1981 ky si .
PFX 1981 Y 1
PFX 1981 ri najr .
SFX 1982 Y 1
SFX 1982 dky sieho .
PFX 1982 Y 1
PFX 1982 r najr .
SFX 1983 Y 1
SFX 1983 dky siemu .
PFX 1983 Y 1
PFX 1983 r najr .
SFX 1984 Y 1
SFX 1984 ky som .
PFX 1984 Y 1
PFX 1984 ri najr .
SFX 1985 Y 1
SFX 1985 ky sim .
PFX 1985 Y 1
PFX 1985 ri najr .
SFX 1986 Y 1
SFX 1986 ky sich .
PFX 1986 Y 1
PFX 1986 ri najr .
SFX 1987 Y 1
SFX 1987 ky simi .
PFX 1987 Y 1
PFX 1987 ri najr .
SFX 1988 Y 1
SFX 1988 dky sie .
PFX 1988 Y 1
PFX 1988 r najr .
SFX 1989 Y 1
SFX 1989 ky sia .
PFX 1989 Y 1
PFX 1989 ri najr .
SFX 1990 Y 1
SFX 1990 ky sej .
PFX 1990 Y 1
PFX 1990 ri najr .
SFX 1991 Y 1
SFX 1991 ky siu .
PFX 1991 Y 1
PFX 1991 ri najr .
SFX 1992 Y 1
SFX 1992 ky sou .
PFX 1992 Y 1
PFX 1992 ri najr .
SFX 1993 N 1
SFX 1993 ata iat .
SFX 1994 Y 1
SFX 1994 0 ieme .
PFX 1994 Y 1
PFX 1994 0 po .
SFX 1995 Y 1
SFX 1995 0 iete .
PFX 1995 Y 1
PFX 1995 0 po .
SFX 1996 Y 1
SFX 1996 0 u .
PFX 1996 Y 1
PFX 1996 0 po .
SFX 1997 Y 1
SFX 1997 0 iem .
PFX 1997 Y 1
PFX 1997 0 po .
SFX 1998 Y 1
SFX 1998 0 ies .
PFX 1998 Y 1
PFX 1998 0 po .
SFX 1999 Y 1
SFX 1999 0 ie .
PFX 1999 Y 1
PFX 1999 0 po .
SFX 2000 Y 1
SFX 2000 t a .
PFX 2000 Y 1
PFX 2000 0 po .
SFX 2001 Y 1
SFX 2001 em mich .
PFX 2001 Y 1
PFX 2001 s si .
SFX 2002 Y 1
SFX 2002 em mim .
PFX 2002 Y 1
PFX 2002 s si .
SFX 2003 Y 1
SFX 2003 em mimi .
PFX 2003 Y 1
PFX 2003 s si .
SFX 2004 Y 1
SFX 2004 em mi .
PFX 2004 Y 1
PFX 2004 s si .
SFX 2005 Y 1
SFX 2005 a 0 .
PFX 2005 Y 1
PFX 2005 s si .
SFX 2006 Y 1
SFX 2006 o 0 .
PFX 2006 Y 1
PFX 2006 s si .
SFX 2007 N 1
SFX 2007 o ej .
SFX 2008 Y 1
SFX 2008 o ej .
PFX 2008 Y 1
PFX 2008 0 naj .
SFX 2009 Y 1
SFX 2009 0 e .
PFX 2009 Y 1
PFX 2009 spi sp .
SFX 2010 N 1
SFX 2010 a ch .
SFX 2011 N 1
SFX 2011 a m .
SFX 2012 N 1
SFX 2012 ia ej .
SFX 2013 N 1
SFX 2013 ia ou .
SFX 2014 Y 1
SFX 2014 0 e .
PFX 2014 Y 1
PFX 2014 sti st .
SFX 2015 N 1
SFX 2015 e ho .
SFX 2016 N 1
SFX 2016 e mu .
SFX 2017 N 1
SFX 2017 e im .
SFX 2018 N 1
SFX 2018 ak ka .
SFX 2019 N 1
SFX 2019 ak kovi .
SFX 2020 N 1
SFX 2020 ak ku .
SFX 2021 N 1
SFX 2021 ak kom .
SFX 2022 N 1
SFX 2022 ak kovia .
SFX 2023 N 1
SFX 2023 ak kov .
SFX 2024 N 1
SFX 2024 ak koch .
SFX 2025 N 1
SFX 2025 ak kami .
SFX 2026 N 1
SFX 2026 x gmi .
SFX 2027 N 1
SFX 2027 ra er .
SFX 2028 N 1
SFX 2028 yto eto .
SFX 2029 N 1
SFX 2029 to chto .
SFX 2030 N 1
SFX 2030 to mto .
SFX 2031 N 1
SFX 2031 to mito .
SFX 2032 N 1
SFX 2032 yto ato .
SFX 2033 N 1
SFX 2033 yto ejto .
SFX 2034 N 1
SFX 2034 yto uto .
SFX 2035 N 1
SFX 2035 yto outo .
SFX 2036 N 1
SFX 2036 yto ehoto .
SFX 2037 N 1
SFX 2037 yto emuto .
SFX 2038 N 1
SFX 2038 yto omto .
SFX 2039 N 1
SFX 2039 yto ito .
SFX 2040 Y 1
SFX 2040 o 0 .
PFX 2040 Y 1
PFX 2040 t ti .
SFX 2041 Y 1
SFX 2041 0 hto .
PFX 2041 Y 1
PFX 2041 ten 0 .
SFX 2042 Y 1
SFX 2042 0 muto .
PFX 2042 Y 1
PFX 2042 ten 0 .
SFX 2043 Y 1
SFX 2043 0 mto .
PFX 2043 Y 1
PFX 2043 ten 0 .
PFX 2044 N 1
PFX 2044 ten tym .
PFX 2045 N 1
PFX 2045 ten ti .
PFX 2046 N 1
PFX 2046 ten tych .
PFX 2047 N 1
PFX 2047 ten tymi .
PFX 2048 N 1
PFX 2048 ten tie .
PFX 2049 N 1
PFX 2049 ten toho .
PFX 2050 N 1
PFX 2050 ten tomu .
PFX 2051 N 1
PFX 2051 ten tom .
SFX 2052 Y 1
SFX 2052 a 0 .
PFX 2052 Y 1
PFX 2052 t ti .
SFX 2053 Y 1
SFX 2053 ct iem .
PFX 2053 Y 1
PFX 2053 t t .
SFX 2054 Y 1
SFX 2054 ct ies .
PFX 2054 Y 1
PFX 2054 t t .
SFX 2055 Y 1
SFX 2055 ct ie .
PFX 2055 Y 1
PFX 2055 t t .
SFX 2056 Y 1
SFX 2056 ct ieme .
PFX 2056 Y 1
PFX 2056 t t .
SFX 2057 Y 1
SFX 2057 ct iete .
PFX 2057 Y 1
PFX 2057 t t .
SFX 2058 Y 1
SFX 2058 t u .
PFX 2058 Y 1
PFX 2058 ti t .
SFX 2059 Y 1
SFX 2059 t 0 .
PFX 2059 Y 1
PFX 2059 ti t .
SFX 2060 Y 1
SFX 2060 t me .
PFX 2060 Y 1
PFX 2060 ti t .
SFX 2061 Y 1
SFX 2061 0 e .
PFX 2061 Y 1
PFX 2061 ti t .
SFX 2062 Y 1
SFX 2062 t uc .
PFX 2062 Y 1
PFX 2062 ti t .
SFX 2063 N 1
SFX 2063 to hto .
SFX 2064 N 1
SFX 2064 to muto .
SFX 2065 Y 1
SFX 2065 to 0 .
PFX 2065 Y 1
PFX 2065 0 tym .
SFX 2066 Y 1
SFX 2066 to 0 .
PFX 2066 Y 1
PFX 2066 0 tie .
SFX 2067 Y 1
SFX 2067 to 0 .
PFX 2067 Y 1
PFX 2067 0 tych .
SFX 2068 Y 1
SFX 2068 to 0 .
PFX 2068 Y 1
PFX 2068 0 tymi .
PFX 2069 N 1
PFX 2069 to tie .
PFX 2070 N 1
PFX 2070 to tych .
PFX 2071 N 1
PFX 2071 to tym .
PFX 2072 N 1
PFX 2072 to tymi .
PFX 2073 N 1
PFX 2073 t toh .
SFX 2074 N 1
SFX 2074 y iech .
SFX 2075 N 1
SFX 2075 i oma .
SFX 2076 N 1
SFX 2076 i omi .
SFX 2077 N 1
SFX 2077 i aja .
SFX 2078 Y 1
SFX 2078 0 e .
PFX 2078 Y 1
PFX 2078 tri tr .
SFX 2079 N 1
SFX 2079 y eba .
SFX 2080 N 1
SFX 2080 y ebe .
SFX 2081 N 1
SFX 2081 y ebou .
PFX 2082 N 1
PFX 2082 ta tej .
PFX 2083 N 1
PFX 2083 ta tu .
SFX 2084 Y 1
SFX 2084 0 uto .
PFX 2084 Y 1
PFX 2084 ta 0 .
PFX 2085 N 1
PFX 2085 ta tie .
PFX 2086 N 1
PFX 2086 ta tych .
PFX 2087 N 1
PFX 2087 ta tym .
PFX 2088 N 1
PFX 2088 ta tymi .
PFX 2089 N 1
PFX 2089 ta tou .
SFX 2090 N 1
SFX 2090 _ono nho .
SFX 2091 N 1
SFX 2091 cho si .
SFX 2092 N 1
SFX 2092 cho su .
SFX 2093 N 1
SFX 2093 cho siam .
SFX 2094 Y 1
SFX 2094 o 0 .
PFX 2094 Y 1
PFX 2094 u usia .
SFX 2095 N 1
SFX 2095 cho sami .
SFX 2096 N 1
SFX 2096 ec ka .
SFX 2097 N 1
SFX 2097 ec kovi .
SFX 2098 N 1
SFX 2098 ec kom .
SFX 2099 N 1
SFX 2099 ec kovia .
SFX 2100 N 1
SFX 2100 ec kov .
SFX 2101 N 1
SFX 2101 ec koch .
SFX 2102 N 1
SFX 2102 ec kami .
SFX 2103 Y 1
SFX 2103 t 0 .
PFX 2103 Y 1
PFX 2103 un unes .
SFX 2104 Y 1
SFX 2104 0 e .
PFX 2104 Y 1
PFX 2104 uni un .
SFX 2105 Y 1
SFX 2105 0 e .
PFX 2105 Y 1
PFX 2105 upi up .
SFX 2106 Y 1
SFX 2106 0 e .
PFX 2106 Y 1
PFX 2106 uti ut .
SFX 2107 Y 1
SFX 2107 t 0 .
PFX 2107 Y 1
PFX 2107 uv uved .
SFX 2108 Y 1
SFX 2108 0 e .
PFX 2108 Y 1
PFX 2108 uvi uv .
SFX 2109 N 1
SFX 2109 er rem .
SFX 2110 N 1
SFX 2110 er rev .
SFX 2111 N 1
SFX 2111 er rech .
SFX 2112 Y 1
SFX 2112 a 0 .
PFX 2112 Y 1
PFX 2112 v vi .
SFX 2113 Y 1
SFX 2113 t m .
PFX 2113 Y 1
PFX 2113 ved v .
SFX 2114 Y 1
SFX 2114 t s .
PFX 2114 Y 1
PFX 2114 ved v .
SFX 2115 Y 1
SFX 2115 t 0 .
PFX 2115 Y 1
PFX 2115 ved v .
SFX 2116 Y 1
SFX 2116 t me .
PFX 2116 Y 1
PFX 2116 ved v .
SFX 2117 Y 1
SFX 2117 0 e .
PFX 2117 Y 1
PFX 2117 ved v .
SFX 2118 Y 1
SFX 2118 o 0 .
PFX 2118 Y 1
PFX 2118 v vi .
SFX 2119 N 1
SFX 2119 es sou .
SFX 2120 N 1
SFX 2120 es siam .
SFX 2121 N 1
SFX 2121 es siach .
SFX 2122 N 1
SFX 2122 ela iacej .
SFX 2123 N 1
SFX 2123 ela iac .
SFX 2124 Y 1
SFX 2124 ela jviacej .
PFX 2124 Y 1
PFX 2124 0 n .
SFX 2125 Y 1
SFX 2125 ela jviac .
PFX 2125 Y 1
PFX 2125 0 n .
SFX 2126 N 1
SFX 2126 elky acsi .
SFX 2127 N 1
SFX 2127 elky acsieho .
SFX 2128 N 1
SFX 2128 elky acsiemu .
SFX 2129 N 1
SFX 2129 elky acsom .
SFX 2130 N 1
SFX 2130 elky acsim .
SFX 2131 N 1
SFX 2131 elky acsich .
SFX 2132 N 1
SFX 2132 elky acsimi .
SFX 2133 N 1
SFX 2133 elky acsie .
SFX 2134 N 1
SFX 2134 elky acsia .
SFX 2135 N 1
SFX 2135 elky acsej .
SFX 2136 N 1
SFX 2136 elky acsiu .
SFX 2137 N 1
SFX 2137 elky acsou .
SFX 2138 Y 1
SFX 2138 elky acsi .
PFX 2138 Y 1
PFX 2138 0 naj .
SFX 2139 Y 1
SFX 2139 elky acsieho .
PFX 2139 Y 1
PFX 2139 0 naj .
SFX 2140 Y 1
SFX 2140 elky acsiemu .
PFX 2140 Y 1
PFX 2140 0 naj .
SFX 2141 Y 1
SFX 2141 elky acsom .
PFX 2141 Y 1
PFX 2141 0 naj .
SFX 2142 Y 1
SFX 2142 elky acsim .
PFX 2142 Y 1
PFX 2142 0 naj .
SFX 2143 Y 1
SFX 2143 elky acsich .
PFX 2143 Y 1
PFX 2143 0 naj .
SFX 2144 Y 1
SFX 2144 elky acsimi .
PFX 2144 Y 1
PFX 2144 0 naj .
SFX 2145 Y 1
SFX 2145 elky acsie .
PFX 2145 Y 1
PFX 2145 0 naj .
SFX 2146 Y 1
SFX 2146 elky acsia .
PFX 2146 Y 1
PFX 2146 0 naj .
SFX 2147 Y 1
SFX 2147 elky acsej .
PFX 2147 Y 1
PFX 2147 0 naj .
SFX 2148 Y 1
SFX 2148 elky acsiu .
PFX 2148 Y 1
PFX 2148 0 naj .
SFX 2149 Y 1
SFX 2149 elky acsou .
PFX 2149 Y 1
PFX 2149 0 naj .
PFX 2150 N 1
PFX 2150 vel vacs .
PFX 2151 N 1
PFX 2151 vel najvacs .
SFX 2152 N 1
SFX 2152 ly iel .
SFX 2153 Y 1
SFX 2153 st me .
PFX 2153 Y 1
PFX 2153 v poved .
SFX 2154 Y 1
SFX 2154 st te .
PFX 2154 Y 1
PFX 2154 v poved .
SFX 2155 Y 1
SFX 2155 iest edu .
PFX 2155 Y 1
PFX 2155 0 po .
SFX 2156 Y 1
SFX 2156 st m .
PFX 2156 Y 1
PFX 2156 v poved .
SFX 2157 Y 1
SFX 2157 t 0 .
PFX 2157 Y 1
PFX 2157 v poved .
SFX 2158 Y 1
SFX 2158 st 0 .
PFX 2158 Y 1
PFX 2158 v poved .
SFX 2159 Y 1
SFX 2159 st m .
PFX 2159 Y 1
PFX 2159 v ved .
SFX 2160 Y 1
SFX 2160 t 0 .
PFX 2160 Y 1
PFX 2160 v ved .
SFX 2161 Y 1
SFX 2161 st 0 .
PFX 2161 Y 1
PFX 2161 v ved .
SFX 2162 Y 1
SFX 2162 st me .
PFX 2162 Y 1
PFX 2162 v ved .
SFX 2163 Y 1
SFX 2163 st te .
PFX 2163 Y 1
PFX 2163 v ved .
SFX 2164 Y 1
SFX 2164 or ra .
PFX 2164 Y 1
PFX 2164 vi v .
SFX 2165 Y 1
SFX 2165 or ru .
PFX 2165 Y 1
PFX 2165 vi v .
SFX 2166 Y 1
SFX 2166 or re .
PFX 2166 Y 1
PFX 2166 vi v .
SFX 2167 Y 1
SFX 2167 or rom .
PFX 2167 Y 1
PFX 2167 vi v .
SFX 2168 Y 1
SFX 2168 or ry .
PFX 2168 Y 1
PFX 2168 vi v .
SFX 2169 Y 1
SFX 2169 or rov .
PFX 2169 Y 1
PFX 2169 vi v .
SFX 2170 Y 1
SFX 2170 or roch .
PFX 2170 Y 1
PFX 2170 vi v .
SFX 2171 Y 1
SFX 2171 or rami .
PFX 2171 Y 1
PFX 2171 vi v .
SFX 2172 Y 1
SFX 2172 zt ieme .
PFX 2172 Y 1
PFX 2172 v pov .
SFX 2173 Y 1
SFX 2173 zt iete .
PFX 2173 Y 1
PFX 2173 v pov .
SFX 2174 Y 1
SFX 2174 t u .
PFX 2174 Y 1
PFX 2174 vi pov .
SFX 2175 Y 1
SFX 2175 zt iem .
PFX 2175 Y 1
PFX 2175 v pov .
SFX 2176 Y 1
SFX 2176 zt ies .
PFX 2176 Y 1
PFX 2176 v pov .
SFX 2177 Y 1
SFX 2177 zt ie .
PFX 2177 Y 1
PFX 2177 v pov .
SFX 2178 Y 1
SFX 2178 zt iem .
PFX 2178 Y 1
PFX 2178 v v .
SFX 2179 Y 1
SFX 2179 zt ies .
PFX 2179 Y 1
PFX 2179 v v .
SFX 2180 Y 1
SFX 2180 zt ie .
PFX 2180 Y 1
PFX 2180 v v .
SFX 2181 Y 1
SFX 2181 zt ieme .
PFX 2181 Y 1
PFX 2181 v v .
SFX 2182 Y 1
SFX 2182 zt iete .
PFX 2182 Y 1
PFX 2182 v v .
SFX 2183 Y 1
SFX 2183 t u .
PFX 2183 Y 1
PFX 2183 vi v .
SFX 2184 Y 1
SFX 2184 t 0 .
PFX 2184 Y 1
PFX 2184 vi v .
SFX 2185 Y 1
SFX 2185 t me .
PFX 2185 Y 1
PFX 2185 vi v .
SFX 2186 Y 1
SFX 2186 0 e .
PFX 2186 Y 1
PFX 2186 vi v .
SFX 2187 Y 1
SFX 2187 t uc .
PFX 2187 Y 1
PFX 2187 vi v .
SFX 2188 Y 1
SFX 2188 iect ecieme .
PFX 2188 Y 1
PFX 2188 0 po .
SFX 2189 Y 1
SFX 2189 iect eciete .
PFX 2189 Y 1
PFX 2189 0 po .
SFX 2190 Y 1
SFX 2190 iect ecu .
PFX 2190 Y 1
PFX 2190 0 po .
SFX 2191 Y 1
SFX 2191 iect eciem .
PFX 2191 Y 1
PFX 2191 0 po .
SFX 2192 Y 1
SFX 2192 iect ecies .
PFX 2192 Y 1
PFX 2192 0 po .
SFX 2193 Y 1
SFX 2193 iect ecie .
PFX 2193 Y 1
PFX 2193 0 po .
SFX 2194 Y 1
SFX 2194 0 e .
PFX 2194 Y 1
PFX 2194 vli vl .
SFX 2195 Y 1
SFX 2195 t 0 .
PFX 2195 Y 1
PFX 2195 vm vmet .
SFX 2196 Y 1
SFX 2196 t 0 .
PFX 2196 Y 1
PFX 2196 vn vnes .
SFX 2197 Y 1
SFX 2197 0 e .
PFX 2197 Y 1
PFX 2197 vni vn .
SFX 2198 N 1
SFX 2198 et mu .
SFX 2199 N 1
SFX 2199 et mot .
SFX 2200 N 1
SFX 2200 et my .
SFX 2201 N 1
SFX 2201 et mov .
SFX 2202 N 1
SFX 2202 et moch .
SFX 2203 N 1
SFX 2203 et mati .
SFX 2204 N 1
SFX 2204 na en .
SFX 2205 Y 1
SFX 2205 0 e .
PFX 2205 Y 1
PFX 2205 vti vt .
SFX 2206 N 1
SFX 2206 y as .
SFX 2207 Y 1
SFX 2207 0 e .
PFX 2207 Y 1
PFX 2207 vym vyme .
SFX 2208 N 1
SFX 2208 0 sie .
SFX 2209 Y 1
SFX 2209 0 sie .
PFX 2209 Y 1
PFX 2209 0 naj .
SFX 2210 N 1
SFX 2210 aka iak .
SFX 2211 N 1
SFX 2211 ok kych .
SFX 2212 N 1
SFX 2212 ok kym .
SFX 2213 N 1
SFX 2213 ok kymi .
SFX 2214 N 1
SFX 2214 ok kej .
SFX 2215 N 1
SFX 2215 ok kou .
SFX 2216 N 1
SFX 2216 ok keho .
SFX 2217 N 1
SFX 2217 ok kemu .
SFX 2218 N 1
SFX 2218 ok ko .
SFX 2219 N 1
SFX 2219 o eho .
SFX 2220 N 1
SFX 2220 o emu .
PFX 2221 N 1
PFX 2221 zl horsi .
PFX 2222 N 1
PFX 2222 zl najhorsi .
SFX 2223 Y 1
SFX 2223 0 e .
PFX 2223 Y 1
PFX 2223 zli zl .
SFX 2224 N 1
SFX 2224 zly horsi .
SFX 2225 N 1
SFX 2225 zly horsieho .
SFX 2226 N 1
SFX 2226 zly horsiemu .
SFX 2227 N 1
SFX 2227 zly horsom .
SFX 2228 N 1
SFX 2228 zly horsim .
SFX 2229 N 1
SFX 2229 zly horsich .
